South Dakota, session 2026, SB75.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That 2024 Session Laws, chapter 229, § 1 be AMENDED:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the general fund the sum of
$7,000,000 to the Office of the Attorney General, for the purpose of creating a
cybersecurity services initiative in this state.
Section 2. That 2024 Session Laws, chapter 229, § 2 be AMENDED:
Section 2. The moneys appropriated in section 1 of this Act must be used
exclusively to expand and improve cybersecurity for counties, nonprofit entities providing
drinking water and sanitary sewer utilities, utilities operated by a political subdivision, and
municipalities in the State of South Dakota, via any infrastructure and technology that can
protect the information technology assets of this state, and for administrative costs
necessary for expending these dollars efficiently and effectively.
Section 3. That 2024 Session Laws, chapter 229, § 3 be AMENDED:
Section 3. Moneys must be disbursed according to the specific needs of the project
and in such a way that best advances the cybersecurity needs of the state.

26.539.20 2 75
An Act to amend the type of entities eligible to participate in the cybersecurity services
initiative.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 75
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 75 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB75 ENROLLED